Indiana, session 2026, HB1164.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-7-14-12.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 172, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.7. (a) Not later than December
September 1 each year, the redevelopment commissioners shall file
with the department of local government finance and with the unit's
executive and fiscal body a report setting out a spending plan for the
next calendar year describing planned expenditures. The spending plan
must be filed in the manner prescribed by the department of local
government finance.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a redevelopment
commission may use money from the redevelopment commission's
allocation fund described in section 39(b)(4) of this chapter and any
other fund maintained by the redevelopment commission only for the
purposes provided in the annual spending plan described in subsection
(a).
(c) A redevelopment commission may use money from funds
described in subsection (b) for the purpose of paying more toward
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


debt service obligations, in order to retire debt service earlier,
regardless of whether that use is listed in the annual spending plan
described in subsection (a). A redevelopment commission making
accelerated debt payments under this subsection may retain the
assessed value associated with the original debt service schedule.
(d) Early debt retirement described in subsection (c) applies
only if the early defeasance of debt is allowed according to the
bond issuance documents.
(c) (e) The department of local government finance shall, before
February 1, 2025, and before February 1 of each year thereafter, submit
a report of the redevelopment commissions that failed to submit the
spending plan required under subsection (a) to the legislative services
agency for distribution to the members of the legislative council. The
report must be in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 2. IC 36-7-14-13.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13.5. Any necessary documents
required to be uploaded to the department of local government
finance or the transparency website must be submitted on or
before July 1, 2027, for a document required to be uploaded after
January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. IC 36-7-14-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.257-2019,
SECTION 115, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 17. (a) After receipt of the written
order of approval of the plan commission and approval of the
municipal legislative body or county executive, the redevelopment
commission shall publish notice of the adoption and substance of the
resolution in accordance with IC 5-3-1. The notice must:
(1) state that maps and plats have been prepared and can be
inspected at the office of the department; and
(2) name a date when the commission will:
(A) receive and hear remonstrances and objections from
persons interested in or affected by the proceedings pertaining
to the proposed project or other actions to be taken under the
resolution; and
(B) determine the public utility and benefit of the proposed
project or other actions; and
(3) include an invitation to overlapping taxing units to attend
and participate in the hearing. The hearing shall include an
illustration of the projected effect on circuit breaker
reductions of the release of ten percent (10%), twenty percent
(20%), and thirty percent (30%), respectively, of assessed
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


value from the allocation area. The completion of the
foregoing illustration may be paid from tax increment
financing funds. The hearing shall include an opportunity for
participant discussion and public comment. The commission
shall include a record of overlapping taxing unit attendance
in its annual report to the department of local government
finance.
All persons affected in any manner by the hearing, including all
taxpayers of the special taxing district, shall be considered notified of
the pendency of the hearing and of subsequent acts, hearings,
adjournments, and orders of the commission by the notice given under
this section.
(b) A copy of the notice of the hearing on the resolution shall be
filed in the office of the unit's plan commission, board of zoning
appeals, works board, park board, and building commissioner, and any
other departments, bodies, or officers of the unit having to do with unit
planning, variances from zoning ordinances, land use, or the issuance
of building permits. These agencies and officers shall take notice of the
pendency of the hearing and, until the commission confirms, modifies
and confirms, or rescinds the resolution, or the confirmation of the
resolution is set aside on appeal, may not:
(1) authorize any construction on property or sewers in the area
described in the resolution, including substantial modifications,
rebuilding, conversion, enlargement, additions, and major
structural improvements; or
(2) take any action regarding the zoning or rezoning of property,
or the opening, closing, or improvement of streets, alleys, or
boulevards in the area described in the resolution.
This subsection does not prohibit the granting of permits for ordinary
maintenance or minor remodeling, or for changes necessary for the
continued occupancy of buildings in the area.
(c) If the resolution to be considered at the hearing includes a
provision establishing or amending an allocation provision under
section 39 of this chapter, the redevelopment commission shall file the
following information with each taxing unit that is wholly or partly
located within the allocation area:
(1) A copy of the notice required by subsection (a).
(2) A statement disclosing the impact of the allocation area,
including the following:
(A) The estimated economic benefits and costs incurred by the
allocation area, as measured by increased employment and
anticipated growth of real property assessed values.
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


(B) The anticipated impact on tax revenues of each taxing unit.
The redevelopment commission shall file the information required by
this subsection with the officers of the taxing unit who are authorized
to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under IC 6-1.1-17-5 at least ten
(10) days before the date of the hearing.
(d) At the hearing, which may be adjourned from time to time, the
redevelopment commission shall hear all persons interested in the
proceedings and shall consider all written remonstrances and
objections that have been filed. After considering the evidence
presented, the commission shall take final action determining the
public utility and benefit of the proposed project or other actions to be
taken under the resolution, and confirming, modifying and confirming,
or rescinding the resolution. The final action taken by the commission
shall be recorded and is final and conclusive, except that an appeal may
be taken in the manner prescribed by section 18 of this chapter.
(e) If the redevelopment commission adopts the resolution and the
resolution includes a provision establishing or amending an allocation
provision under section 39 of this chapter, the redevelopment
commission shall file a copy of the resolution with both the auditor of
the county in which the unit is located and the department of local
government finance, together with any supporting documents that are
relevant to the computation of assessed values in the allocation area,
within thirty (30) days after the date on which the redevelopment
commission takes final action on the resolution.
SECTION 4. IC 36-7-14-39, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2025,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 39. (a) As used in this section:
"Allocation area" means that part of a redevelopment project area
to which an allocation provision of a declaratory resolution adopted
under section 15 of this chapter refers for purposes of distribution and
allocation of property taxes.
"Base assessed value" means, subject to subsection (j), the
following:
(1) If an allocation provision is adopted after June 30, 1995, in a
declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing an economic development area:
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, within the allocation area, as finally determined for
the current assessment date.
(2) If an allocation provision is adopted after June 30, 1997, in a
declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing a redevelopment project area:
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, as finally determined for the current assessment date.
(3) If:
(A) an allocation provision adopted before June 30, 1995, in
a declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing a redevelopment project area expires
after June 30, 1997; and
(B) after June 30, 1997, a new allocation provision is included
in an amendment to the declaratory resolution;
the net assessed value of all the property as finally determined for
the assessment date immediately preceding the effective date of
the allocation provision adopted after June 30, 1997, as adjusted
under subsection (h).
(4) Except as provided in subdivision (5), for all other allocation
areas, the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h).
(5) If an allocation area established in an economic development
area before July 1, 1995, is expanded after June 30, 1995, the
definition in subdivision (1) applies to the expanded part of the
area added after June 30, 1995.
(6) If an allocation area established in a redevelopment project
area before July 1, 1997, is expanded after June 30, 1997, the
definition in subdivision (2) applies to the expanded part of the
area added after June 30, 1997.
Except as provided in section 39.3 of this chapter, "property taxes"
means taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on real property. However, upon
approval by a resolution of the redevelopment commission adopted
before June 1, 1987, "property taxes" also includes taxes imposed
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


under IC 6-1.1 on depreciable personal property. If a redevelopment
commission adopted before June 1, 1987, a resolution to include within
the definition of property taxes, taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on
depreciable personal property that has a useful life in excess of eight
(8) years, the commission may by resolution determine the percentage
of taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on all depreciable personal property
that will be included within the definition of property taxes. However,
the percentage included must not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of
the taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on all depreciable personal property.
(b) A declaratory resolution adopted under section 15 of this chapter
on or before the allocation deadline determined under subsection (i)
may include a provision with respect to the allocation and distribution
of property taxes for the purposes and in the manner provided in this
section. A declaratory resolution previously adopted may include an
allocation provision by the amendment of that declaratory resolution on
or before the allocation deadline determined under subsection (i) in
accordance with the procedures required for its original adoption. A
declaratory resolution or amendment that establishes an allocation
provision must include a specific finding of fact, supported by
evidence, that the adoption of the allocation provision will result in
new property taxes in the area that would not have been generated but
for the adoption of the allocation provision. For an allocation area
established before July 1, 1995, the expiration date of any allocation
provisions for the allocation area is June 30, 2025, or the last date of
any obligations that are outstanding on July 1, 2015, whichever is later.
A declaratory resolution or an amendment that establishes an allocation
provision after June 30, 1995, must specify an expiration date for the
allocation provision. For an allocation area established before July 1,
2008, the expiration date may not be more than thirty (30) years after
the date on which the allocation provision is established. For an
allocation area established after June 30, 2008, the expiration date may
not be more than twenty-five (25) years after the date on which the first
obligation was incurred to pay principal and interest on bonds or lease
rentals on leases payable from tax increment revenues. However, with
respect to bonds or other obligations that were issued before July 1,
2008, if any of the bonds or other obligations that were scheduled when
issued to mature before the specified expiration date and that are
payable only from allocated tax proceeds with respect to the allocation
area remain outstanding as of the expiration date, the allocation
provision does not expire until all of the bonds or other obligations are
no longer outstanding. Notwithstanding any other law, in the case of an
allocation area that is established after June 30, 2019, and that is
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


located in a redevelopment project area described in section
25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, an economic development area described
in section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, or an urban renewal project
area described in section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, the expiration
date of the allocation provision may not be more than thirty-five (35)
years after the date on which the allocation provision is established.
The allocation provision may apply to all or part of the redevelopment
project area. The allocation provision must require that any property
taxes subsequently levied by or for the benefit of any public body
entitled to a distribution of property taxes on taxable property in the
allocation area be allocated and distributed as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proceeds of
the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date
with respect to which the allocation and distribution is made;
or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of
the respective taxing units.
(2) This subdivision applies to a fire protection territory
established after December 31, 2022. If a unit becomes a
participating unit of a fire protection territory that is established
after a declaratory resolution is adopted under section 15 of this
chapter, the excess of the proceeds of the property taxes
attributable to an increase in the property tax rate for the
participating unit of a fire protection territory:
(A) except as otherwise provided by this subdivision, shall be
determined as follows:
STEP ONE: Divide the unit's tax rate for fire protection for
the year before the establishment of the fire protection
territory by the participating unit's tax rate as part of the fire
protection territory.
STEP TWO: Subtract the STEP ONE amount from one (1).
STEP THREE: Multiply the STEP TWO amount by the
allocated property tax attributable to the participating unit of
the fire protection territory; and
(B) to the extent not otherwise included in subdivisions (1)
and (3), the amount determined under STEP THREE of clause
(A) shall be allocated to and distributed in the form of an
allocated property tax revenue pass back to the participating
unit of the fire protection territory for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation is made.
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


However, if the redevelopment commission determines that it is
unable to meet its debt service obligations with regards to the
allocation area without all or part of the allocated property tax
revenue pass back to the participating unit of a fire protection area
under this subdivision, then the allocated property tax revenue
pass back under this subdivision shall be reduced by the amount
necessary for the redevelopment commission to meet its debt
service obligations of the allocation area. The calculation under
this subdivision must be made by the redevelopment commission
in collaboration with the county auditor and the applicable fire
protection territory. Any calculation determined according to
clause (A) must be submitted to the department of local
government finance in the manner prescribed by the department
of local government finance. The department of local government
finance shall verify the accuracy of each calculation.
(3) The excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution is made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivisions (1) and (2) shall be allocated to and, when
collected, paid into the funds of the taxing unit for which the
referendum or local public question was conducted.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property tax
proceeds in excess of those described in subdivisions (1), (2), and
(3) shall be allocated to the redevelopment district and, when
collected, paid into an allocation fund for that allocation area that
may be used by the redevelopment district only to do one (1) or
more of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest on any obligations
payable solely from allocated tax proceeds which are incurred
by the redevelopment district for the purpose of financing or
refinancing the redevelopment of that allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
that allocation area.
(C) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds payable from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area and from the
special tax levied under section 27 of this chapter.
(D) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the
unit to pay for local public improvements that are physically
located in or physically connected to that allocation area.
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


(E) Pay premiums on the redemption before maturity of bonds
payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in that
allocation area.
(F) Make payments on leases payable from allocated tax
proceeds in that allocation area under section 25.2 of this
chapter.
(G) Reimburse the unit for expenditures made by it for local
public improvements (which include buildings, parking
facilities, and other items described in section 25.1(a) of this
chapter) that are physically located in or physically connected
to that allocation area.
(H) Reimburse the unit for rentals paid by it for a building or
parking facility that is physically located in or physically
connected to that allocation area under any lease entered into
under IC 36-1-10.
(I) For property taxes first due and payable before January 1,
2009, pay all or a part of a property tax replacement credit to
taxpayers in an allocation area as determined by the
redevelopment commission. This credit equals the amount
determined under the following STEPS for each taxpayer in a
taxing district (as defined in IC 6-1.1-1-20) that contains all or
part of the allocation area:
STEP ONE: Determine that part of the sum of the amounts
under IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(1)(A), IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(2),
IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(3), IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(4), and
IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(5) (before their repeal) that is attributable to
the taxing district.
STEP TWO: Divide:
(i) that part of each county's eligible property tax
replacement amount (as defined in IC 6-1.1-21-2 (before its
repeal)) for that year as determined under IC 6-1.1-21-4
(before its repeal) that is attributable to the taxing district;
by
(ii) the STEP ONE sum.
STEP THREE: Multiply:
(i) the STEP TWO quotient; times
(ii) the total amount of the taxpayer's taxes (as defined in
IC 6-1.1-21-2 (before its repeal)) levied in the taxing district
that have been allocated during that year to an allocation
fund under this section.
If not all the taxpayers in an allocation area receive the credit
in full, each taxpayer in the allocation area is entitled to
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


receive the same proportion of the credit. A taxpayer may not
receive a credit under this section and a credit under section
39.5 of this chapter (before its repeal) in the same year.
(J) Pay expenses incurred by the redevelopment commission
for local public improvements that are in the allocation area or
serving the allocation area. Public improvements include
buildings, parking facilities, and other items described in
section 25.1(a) of this chapter.
(K) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses
incurred in training employees of industrial facilities that are
located:
(i) in the allocation area; and
(ii) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in
any year may not exceed the total amount of money in the
allocation fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the
industrial facilities described in this clause. The
reimbursements under this clause must be made within three
(3) years after the date on which the investments that are the
basis for the increment financing are made.
(L) Pay the costs of carrying out an eligible efficiency project
(as defined in IC 36-9-41-1.5) within the unit that established
the redevelopment commission. However, property tax
proceeds may be used under this clause to pay the costs of
carrying out an eligible efficiency project only if those
property tax proceeds exceed the amount necessary to do the
following:
(i) Make, when due, any payments required under clauses
(A) through (K), including any payments of principal and
interest on bonds and other obligations payable under this
subdivision, any payments of premiums under this
subdivision on the redemption before maturity of bonds, and
any payments on leases payable under this subdivision.
(ii) Make any reimbursements required under this
subdivision.
(iii) Pay any expenses required under this subdivision.
(iv) Establish, augment, or restore any debt service reserve
under this subdivision.
(M) Expend money and provide financial assistance as
authorized in section 12.2(a)(27) of this chapter.
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


(N) Expend revenues that are allocated for police and fire
services on both capital expenditures and operating expenses
as authorized in section 12.2(a)(28) of this chapter.
(O) Expend money for the maintenance of an
infrastructure project within a tax increment financing
district if the infrastructure project was originally funded
or supported by tax increment financing funds and if the
use of the funds is limited to the remaining life of the
project. Maintenance expenses eligible under this clause
include:
(i) road and sidewalk repair and upkeep;
(ii) street lighting and landscaping;
(iii) trail maintenance;
(iv) trash collection;
(v) retaining wall stabilization;
(vi) parking facilities;
(vii) administrative expenses of the commission that
would not otherwise have been incurred but for the tax
increment financing project; and
(viii) other tax increment financing funded facilities.
This clause does not relieve an underlying taxing unit of its
maintenance obligations for infrastructure projects not
funded by tax increment financing or after the expiration
of the allocation area.
(P) Share revenue with a local economic development
organization that is recognized by the Indiana economic
development corporation:
(i) for a period of less than four (4) years; and
(ii) in an amount that may not exceed the amount equal
to thirty percent (30%) of the local economic
development organization's annual budget.
The allocation fund may not be used for operating expenses of the
commission.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (g), before June 15 of each
year, the commission shall do the following:
(A) Determine the amount, if any, by which the assessed value
of the taxable property in the allocation area for the most
recent assessment date minus the base assessed value, when
multiplied by the estimated tax rate of the allocation area, will
exceed the amount of assessed value needed to produce the
property taxes necessary to make, when due, principal and
interest payments on bonds described in subdivision (4), plus
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (4).
(B) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the fiscal
body of the county or municipality that established the
department of redevelopment, and the officers who are
authorized to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under
IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other taxing units that is wholly
or partly located within the allocation area. The county auditor,
upon receiving the notice, shall forward this notice (in an
electronic format) to the department of local government
finance not later than June 15 of each year. The notice must:
(i) state the amount, if any, of excess assessed value that the
commission has determined may be allocated to the
respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1); or
(ii) state that the commission has determined that there is no
excess assessed value that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units
the amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
commission. The commission may not authorize an allocation
of assessed value to the respective taxing units under this
subdivision if to do so would endanger the interests of the
holders of bonds described in subdivision (4) or lessors under
section 25.3 of this chapter.
(C) If:
(i) the amount of excess assessed value determined by the
commission is expected to generate more than two hundred
percent (200%) of the amount of allocated tax proceeds
necessary to make, when due, principal and interest
payments on bonds described in subdivision (4); plus
(ii) the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (4);
the commission shall submit to the legislative body of the unit
its determination of the excess assessed value that the
commission proposes to allocate to the respective taxing units
in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1). The legislative
body of the unit may approve the commission's determination
or modify the amount of the excess assessed value that will be
allocated to the respective taxing units in the manner
prescribed in subdivision (1).
(6) Notwithstanding subdivision (5), in the case of an allocation
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


area that is established after June 30, 2019, and that is located in
a redevelopment project area described in section 25.1(c)(3)(C)
of this chapter, an economic development area described in
section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, or an urban renewal project
area described in section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, for each
year the allocation provision is in effect, if the amount of excess
assessed value determined by the commission under subdivision
(5)(A) is expected to generate more than two hundred percent
(200%) of:
(A) the amount of allocated tax proceeds necessary to make,
when due, principal and interest payments on bonds described
in subdivision (4) for the project; plus
(B) the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (4) for the project;
the amount of the excess assessed value that generates more than
two hundred percent (200%) of the amounts described in clauses
(A) and (B) shall be allocated to the respective taxing units in the
manner prescribed by subdivision (1).
(c) For the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing
unit or units, the assessed value of taxable property in a territory in the
allocation area that is annexed by any taxing unit after the effective
date of the allocation provision of the declaratory resolution is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation and distribution is made; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(d) Property tax proceeds allocable to the redevelopment district
under subsection (b)(4) may, subject to subsection (b)(5), be
irrevocably pledged by the redevelopment district for payment as set
forth in subsection (b)(4).
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon
petition of the redevelopment commission, reassess the taxable
property situated upon or in, or added to, the allocation area, effective
on the next assessment date after the petition.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
property in the allocation area, for purposes of tax limitation, property
tax replacement, and formulation of the budget, tax rate, and tax levy
for each political subdivision in which the property is located is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property as valued without regard to
this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


(g) If any part of the allocation area is located in an enterprise zone
created under IC 5-28-15, the unit that designated the allocation area
shall create funds as specified in this subsection. A unit that has
obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(4) shall establish an allocation fund for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(4) and a special zone fund. Such a unit
shall, until the end of the enterprise zone phase out period, deposit each
year in the special zone fund any amount in the allocation fund derived
from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection
(b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(3) from property located in the enterprise zone
that exceeds the amount sufficient for the purposes specified in
subsection (b)(4) for the year. The amount sufficient for purposes
specified in subsection (b)(4) for the year shall be determined based on
the pro rata portion of such current property tax proceeds from the part
of the enterprise zone that is within the allocation area as compared to
all such current property tax proceeds derived from the allocation area.
A unit that has no obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated
tax proceeds under subsection (b)(4) shall establish a special zone fund
and deposit all the property tax proceeds in excess of those described
in subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(3) in the fund derived from
property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection (b)(1),
(b)(2), and (b)(3) from property located in the enterprise zone. The unit
that creates the special zone fund shall use the fund (based on the
recommendations of the urban enterprise association) for programs in
job training, job enrichment, and basic skill development that are
designed to benefit residents and employers in the enterprise zone or
other purposes specified in subsection (b)(4), except that where
reference is made in subsection (b)(4) to allocation area it shall refer
for purposes of payments from the special zone fund only to that part
of the allocation area that is also located in the enterprise zone. Those
programs shall reserve at least one-half (1/2) of their enrollment in any
session for residents of the enterprise zone.
(h) The state board of accounts and department of local government
finance shall make the rules and prescribe the forms and procedures
that they consider expedient for the implementation of this chapter.
After each reassessment in an area under a reassessment plan prepared
under IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, the department of local government finance shall
adjust the base assessed value one (1) time to neutralize any effect of
the reassessment of the real property in the area on the property tax
proceeds allocated to the redevelopment district under this section.
After each annual adjustment under IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value one (1)
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


time to neutralize any effect of the annual adjustment on the property
tax proceeds allocated to the redevelopment district under this section.
However, the adjustments under this subsection:
(1) may not include the effect of phasing in assessed value due to
property tax abatements under IC 6-1.1-12.1;
(2) may not produce less property tax proceeds allocable to the
redevelopment district under subsection (b)(4) than would
otherwise have been received if the reassessment under the
reassessment plan or the annual adjustment had not occurred; and
(3) may decrease base assessed value only to the extent that
assessed values in the allocation area have been decreased due to
annual adjustments or the reassessment under the reassessment
plan.
Assessed value increases attributable to the application of an abatement
schedule under IC 6-1.1-12.1 may not be included in the base assessed
value of an allocation area. The department of local government
finance may prescribe procedures for county and township officials to
follow to assist the department in making the adjustments.
(i) The allocation deadline referred to in subsection (b) is
determined in the following manner:
(1) The initial allocation deadline is December 31, 2011.
(2) Subject to subdivision (3), the initial allocation deadline and
subsequent allocation deadlines are automatically extended in
increments of five (5) years, so that allocation deadlines
subsequent to the initial allocation deadline fall on December 31,
2016, and December 31 of each fifth year thereafter.
(3) At least one (1) year before the date of an allocation deadline
determined under subdivision (2), the general assembly may enact
a law that:
(A) terminates the automatic extension of allocation deadlines
under subdivision (2); and
(B) specifically designates a particular date as the final
allocation deadline.
(j) If a redevelopment commission adopts a declaratory resolution
or an amendment to a declaratory resolution that contains an allocation
provision and the redevelopment commission makes either of the
filings required under section 17(e) of this chapter after the first
anniversary of the effective date of the allocation provision, the auditor
of the county in which the unit is located shall compute the base
assessed value for the allocation area using the assessment date
immediately preceding the later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125


auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(k) For an allocation area established after June 30, 2025,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system.
2026 IN 1164—LS 6712/DI 125